Hawaii statutes.
§25-7 Apportionment advisory councils.
The apportionment advisory councils for the respective basic island units shall
be constituted at the same time as the reapportionment commission and the
members shall be appointed to hold their offices for such term in the manner
prescribed in Article IV of the Constitution. Each advisory council shall
serve in an advisory capacity to the reapportionment commission as to matters
affecting its basic island unit. Each member shall be a registered voter of
the member's basic island unit. A member of a council shall, for the period
the member holds the member's office, receive compensation of $50 per meeting
but not to exceed $500 per month and shall be allowed actual and necessary
expenses incurred in the performance of the member's duties. Payments for
compensation and expenses shall be made by warrants signed by the comptroller
on vouchers properly endorsed by the chairperson of the appropriate advisory
council. The members of the council shall be exempt from the provisions of
chapter 76. Each council shall elect its own chairperson and may elect other
officers as may be necessary to carry out its functions. Meetings shall be
called and held at the call of the chairperson or by a quorum which shall be a
majority of the members. [L 1969, c 79, §7; am L 1973, c 217, §9(b); am L 1979,
c 51, §4; gen ch 1993; am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next